North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-14 Forage Certification

4.1-14-01.
Certification of forage — Compliance with other standards.

To obtain certification that weeds prohibited according to the standards of the North American invasive species management association are not cut when producing viable seeds and included in baled forage, the owner of the forage shall request that the agriculture commissioner conduct a certification inspection.

Upon receiving the request, the agriculture commissioner shall:

Inspect the forage acreage within ten days before harvest to verify that weeds prohibited according to the standards of the North American invasive species management association are not present and producing viable seeds; and

Ascertain that the scheduled harvest has occurred;

Determine the number of bales for which certification tags or department-approved twine, or both, must be issued; and

Verify that the baled forage is stored or will be stored only in an area where weeds prohibited according to the standards of the North American invasive species management association are not present and producing viable seeds.

If the agriculture commissioner determines that the conditions of subsection 2 have been met, the commissioner shall issue and affix or cause to be affixed on each bale of forage one dated certification tag or shall authorize the use of department-approved twine to bale the forage.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 85, § 1; 2013, ch. 70, § 1.

4.1-14-02.
Agents of the commissioner — Designation — Training.

The agriculture commissioner may designate individuals to serve as agents of the commissioner for the purpose of conducting the inspections permitted by this chapter. To be designated as an agent, an individual must:

Be a weed control officer;

Be a member of a county or a city weed board;

Be determined by the commissioner to have a level of education and experience sufficient to accurately perform the requested certifications; or

At least once every thirty-six months, successfully complete a training program conducted by the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 85, § 1.

4.1-14-03.
Reciprocal recognition of certification.

The agriculture commissioner may contract with any governmental entity that is responsible for the certification of forage in another state or province and provide for the reciprocal recognition of such certifications.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 85, § 1.

4.1-14-04.
Fees — Continuing appropriation.

The agriculture commissioner may set and charge fees for certifying forage in accordance with this chapter. The commissioner shall deposit moneys collected under this chapter in the environment and rangeland protection fund.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 85, § 1.